Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-185] Amendment pursuant to judicial
reorganization. (a) A corporation's articles may be amended without board
approval or approval by the members or approval required pursuant to section
414D‑188 to carry out a plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by a
court of competent jurisdiction under federal statute if the articles after
amendment contain only provisions required or permitted by section 414D‑32.

(b) The individual or individuals designated
by the court shall deliver to the department director articles of amendment
setting forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) The text of each amendment approved by the court;

(3) The date of the court's order or decree approving
the articles of amendment;

(4) The title of the reorganization proceeding in
which the order or decree was entered; and

(5) A statement that the court had jurisdiction of
the proceeding under federal statute.

(c) This section shall not apply after entry
of a final decree in the reorganization proceeding even though the court
retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to
consummation of the reorganization plan. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next